ro_RO.dic
abrog/K
absorbirăm/O
abăturăți/O
acceptaserăm/O
acetific/K
acoperită/O
acufund/K
acutizând/N
admir/K
adormea/O
adun/K
adăugaseși/O
adăugând/NO
aflu/K
afurc/K
agățase/O
airbag-ul/n
alerg/K
alergam/O
aliniind/N
alunec/K
ambusc/K
amuz/K
antifonând/N
anunț/K
apasă-le/O
api-ul/n
aplecați-i/O
aplic/K
apropriați-l/O
apăraseți/O
apără-l/O
apăsând/NO
ardic/K
argintind/N
artwork-ul/n
arăt/K
ascutară/O
asfințind/N
asigur/K
astup/K
atac/K
atrage-i/O
atroce/e
audă/O
autoacuz/K
autoafirmând/N
autodenunț/K
autoobserv/K
auzind/NO
așezai/O
așteaptă/O
ațâț/K
bagă-l/O
bandwidth-ul/n
baseball-ul/n
benchmark-ul/n
beând/NO
bip-ul/n
blitzkreig-ul/n
bluff-ul/n
bonific/K
bonus-ul/n
boot-loader-ul/n
bootloader-ul/n
bootsplash-ul/n
bornând/N
botezați-i/O
bridging-ul/n
browser-ul/n
buciumând/N
bug-report-ul/n
bugraport-ul/n
buric/K
business-ul/n
bytecode-ul/n
bâțâind/N
băui/O
cac/K
calcifiind/N
call-ul/n
card-ul/n
cat/K
caută/O
cd-ul/n
cdrom-ul/n
cert/K
certând/N
certăreț/t
chamois-ul/n
chart-ul/n
chasse-ul/n
chateaubriand-ul/n
chemat/O
chewing-gum-ul/n
cine-verite-ul/n
circul/K
citeț/t
clip-ul/n
clipotind/N
coace/O
coborând/NO
cocktail-ul/n
codific/K
combin/K
combo-ul/n
combăteți-ne/O
combătând/NO
comport/K
concedând/N
condamn/K
config-ul/n
confund/K
consacrând/N
consider/K
consimțiseși/O
consum/K
contraindic/K
contravenind/N
convocați-o/O
copyright-ul/n
coșcovind/N
crash-ul/n
crescuserăm/O
critic/K
css-ul/n
cufundând/N
cuget/K
cumpărați-i/O
curăț/K
cuserăți/O
căinind/N
călăreț/t
căpătau/O
căuta/O
căutând/NO
cățărăm/O
daemon-ul/n
debarc/K
declin/K
decomandând/N
dedic/K
degajând/N
degazific/K
dejoc/K
delegat/O
delegând/NO
demask/K
denazific/K
denunț/K
depănând/N
descalec/K
descoperiți-vă/O
descosând/NO
descurc/K
descurcăreț/t
descusei/O
descărcând/N
desfac/O
desfășurați-ne/O
deshămând/N
desic/K
design-ul/n
desk-ul/n
despiedic/K
destinzând/N
detoxific/K
deux-pieces-ul/n
devenind/NO
device-ul/n
devii/O
dezechilibrând/N
dezintoxic/K
dezlegați-l/O
dezlegând/NO
deșertând/N
difer/K
dirt-track-ul/n
disip/K
disk-ul/n
display-ul/n
displăcând/N
divulg/K
dixieland-ul/n
dizlocați-l/O
doborând/NO
dot-com-ul/n
drive-ul/n
drumeț/t
ducăreț/t
dulce/e
durific/K
dvd-ul/n
dă-i/O
eficace/e
ego-ul/n
electrific/K
erbacee/e
escarific/K
evit/K
execut/K
expir/K
extermin/K
extirpând/N
facă/O
falșific/K
fast-food-ul/n
feroce/e
fierbinte/e
firewall-ul/n
flame-war-ul/n
fleț/t
floppy-ul/n
fluier/K
fps-ul/n
frec/K
fremătând/N
fur/K
făceți-l/O
gadget-ul/n
germinând/N
ghetto-ul/n
glorific/K
gui-ul/n
harddisc-ul/n
header-ul/n
hobby-ul/n
hopăind/N
hrăpăreț/t
html-ul/n
icon-ul/n
identific/K
ierată/O
imnific/K
impacientând/N
impurific/K
indic/K
ineficace/e
inflamând/N
installer-ul/n
intensific/K
intervenind/N
intraserăm/O
intrig/K
irit/K
isteț/t
iubeț/t
iute/e
joystick-ul/n
jucă/O
jupuind/N
justific/K
keylogger-ul/n
know-how-ul/n
legi/O
limpede/e
link-ul/n
livecd-ul/n
logo-ul/n
luați/O
lunec/K
lăieț/t
lăpădând/N
lătăreț/t
mainframe-ul/n
markup-ul/n
mestec/K
metilând/N
mistreț/t
mișc/K
motrice/e
motto-ul/n
mucegăind/N
multicast-ul/n
multiplic/K
mureați/O
mușc/K
mâncând/NO
mângâiați-o/O
măcinând/N
mălăieț/t
măsurase/O
nazific/K
necesitând/N
nelăsaseră/O
nemaifiind/N
nemaiputui/O
nepermițând/N
netmask-ul/n
nevenind/N
newsletter-ul/n
neînvățasem/O
nitrific/K
notepad-ul/n
numără-te/O
nălbind/N
nătăfleț/t
oblig/K
omoară-te/O
omorând/NO
oprim/K
palmtop-ul/n
palpit/K
parolând/N
patch-ul/n
paște-o/O
penalty-ul/n
personific/K
perspicace/e
petrecăreț/t
pier/K
pierdeți-mă/O
pierind/N
pinball-ul/n
pizmăreț/t
pișcând/N
place-mă/O
plimb/K
plimbăreț/t
plug-in/n
plângăreț/t
plăcând/NO
plăzmuind/N
posed/K
precoce/e
predați-mă/O
predeterminând/N
preexist/K
prelevând/N
preluă/O
prenotific/K
preponderând/N
prevăzând/NO
prezentând/NO
priceput-o/O
procur/K
proliferând/N
propag/K
propice/e
prădați-vă/O
puhoind/N
pursânge/e
purtăreț/t
putrific/K
putuseți/O
pușcând/N
pădureț/t
părând/N
quark-ul/n
rade/O
rapace/e
re-extrăgând/N
readăugaseră/O
realergai/O
realergând/NO
reapreciind/N
rece/e
recumpăra/O
recăutând/N
refresh-ul/n
refăcuserăm/O
refăcând/N
reific/K
relatând/N
repezind/N
reprezentați/O
restart-ul/n
resuscitând/N
retrăgeam/O
revizuind/N
revoc/K
reîncarnând/N
reîncearcă-le/O
reînvață-ne/O
reînălțând/N
risc/K
rollback-ul/n
rugaseși/O
rummy-ul/n
râgâind/N
rămânând/N
răscoseai/O
răsfierbând/N
răsturnăm/O
răzbubuind/N
răzjudec/K
răzleț/t
sanctificând/N
satisfăcurăm/O
scanner-ul/n
scheunând/N
scoteți-i/O
script-ul/n
scufund/K
scuipând/N
scăpase/O
scăpărând/N
seamănați-vă/O
sedimentând/N
self-service-ul/n
semeț/t
shell-ul/n
show-ul/n
silicific/K
silicificând/N
simțind/NO
slash-ul/n
slow-fox-ul/n
smârcâind/N
socket-ul/n
speller-ul/n
spumegând/N
spânzur/K
spărgea/O
squash-ul/n
stanțând/N
startup-ul/n
stick-ul/n
streamtuner-ul/n
strecurai/O
străbățând/NO
stăteai/O
subdezvolt/K
subscriind/N
subțire/e
superman-ul/n
superpunând/N
suport/K
supraimprimând/N
suprimând/N
surfing-ul/n
susurând/N
săltat/O
săltăreț/t
tab-ul/n
task-switching-ul/n
telecomandând/N
teletext-ul/n
tenace/e
tic-tac-ul/n
tonific/K
toolkit-ul/n
tracknumber-ul/n
trageți-vă/O
trifurcând/N
trisec/K
trăgeau/O
tsunami-ul/n
twinning-ul/n
tăind/N
umblăreț/t
umidific/K
umple-mă/O
uplink-ul/n
venii/O
verde/e
verific/K
verso-ul/n
vestejind/N
vivace/e
vorace/e
vortex-ul/n
vârați-le/O
văicăreț/t
văitând/N
văităreț/t
văzuseși/O
wc-ul/n
webcam-ul/n
wizard-ul/n
xml-ul/n
zbier/K
zdrăncănind/N
zâmbăreț/t
zâzâind/N
îmbrăcați-vă/O
îmbuc/K
împerechind/N
împărțim/O
încarcerând/N
încearcă-i/O
încheg/K
încrezuseră/O
încârlig/K
încălcând/N
încălțase/O
îndemnai/O
înfigăreț/t
înfrigurând/N
înfrunt/K
înfundase/O
înfăț/O
îngropaseși/O
îngroșând/N
înnăbușind/ON
înotând/ON
înscriseseți/O
înspumeg/K
întemeiați-i/O
întrebase/O
întreprinzând/N
întrevăd/O
întârziind/ON
învârte/O
învârtind/ON
înălțasem/O
înșelându-te/O
înțepau/O
șugubeț/t
șuieț/t
țesuseți/O
țip/K
țopăind/N
